incubator/apertium-ku-fa.ku.dix
    <!-- Prepositions -->
    <pardef n="ba__pr">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/bi__pr">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>bi</l>
          <r>bi<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>pê</l>
          <r>bi<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>pê</l>
          <r>bi<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/di__pr">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>di</l>
          <r>di<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>tê</l>
          <r>di<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>tê</l>
          <r>di<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ji__pr">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>ji</l>
          <r>ji<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>jê</l>
          <r>ji<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>jê</l>
          <r>ji<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/li__pr">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>li</l>
          <r>li<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>lê</l>
          <r>li<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>lê</l>
          <r>li<s n="pr"/><j/>ew<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="niha__adv">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="û__cnjcoo">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gelo__cnjsub">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="û"><i>û</i><par n="û__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="gelo"><i>gelo</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="berî"><i>berî</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="bê ku"><i>bê<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="çaxê ku"><i>çaxê<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="da ku"><i>da<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="digel ku"><i>digel<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="dema"><i>dema</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="dema ku"><i>dema<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="gava"><i>gava</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="gava ku"><i>gava<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="gorî ku"><i>gorî<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="hema ku"><i>hema<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="herwekî ku"><i>herwekî<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="heta"><i>heta</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="heta ku"><i>heta<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ji ber ku"><i>ji<b/>ber<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ji bo ku"><i>ji<b/>bo<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="jibona"><i>jibona</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="jibona ku"><i>jibona<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ku"><i>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="madem ku"><i>madem<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="mîna ku"><i>mîna<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="paşê ku"><i>paşê<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="piştî ku"><i>piştî<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ta ku"><i>ta<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="weke"><i>weke</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="weke ku"><i>weke<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="wexta"><i>wexta</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="wexta ku"><i>wexta<b/>ku</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ger"><i>ger</i><par n="gelo__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ji"><i/><par n="/ji__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bi"><i/><par n="/bi__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="di"><i/><par n="/di__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="li"><i/><par n="/li__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="de"><i>de</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ba"><i>ba</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ber"><i>ber</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bêî"><i>bêî</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="berî"><i>berî</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bi tenê"><i>bi<b/>tenê</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bi xêra"><i>bi<b/>xêra</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="derveyî"><i>derveyî</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ji bilî"><i>ji<b/>bilî</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ji bo"><i>ji<b/>bo</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ji nava"><i>ji<b/>nava</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ji xeynî"><i>ji<b/>xeynî</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="li cem"><i>li<b/>cem</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="li ber"><i>li<b/>ber</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="li dijî"><i>li<b/>dijî</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="li dora"><i>li<b/>dora</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ligel"><i>ligel</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="her"><i>her</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="herî"><i>herî</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="niha"><i>niha</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="paşî"><i>paşî</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="piştre"><i>piştre</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dûre"><i>dûre</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="berê"><i>berê</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="berî"><i>berî</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="duhî"><i>duhî</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="îro"><i>îro</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ewro"><i>ewro</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sibe"><i>sibe</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="par"><i>par</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="îsal"><i>îsal</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hingê"><i>hingê</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lezgîn"><i>lezgîn</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="wer"><i>wer</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ewsal"><i>ewsal</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hindek caran"><i>hindek<b/>caran</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="carinan"><i>carinan</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kêm caran"><i>kêm<b/>caran</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gelek caran"><i>gelek<b/>caran</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
